Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2361
Public power and irrigation district funds; treasurer or other officer; not liable on bond.

Neither the treasurer, nor other officer of the district charged with the handling of its funds, nor their sureties shall be liable for any loss resulting from the failure of any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institutions as to any such deposits made and maintained as provided in sections 77-2353 to 77-2361. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1941, c. 160, § 3, p. 644;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2539;

R.S.1943, § 77-2361;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 74;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 68.